Washington statutes.
RCW 43.07.210

Filing false statements—Penalty.

Any person who files a false statement, which he or she knows to be false, in the articles of incorporation or in any other materials required to be filed with the secretary of state shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

[ 1984 c 75 s 25.]